Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.28.010

General laws applicable.

Code cities shall have the authority to enter into contracts for joint acquisition of land and improvement thereof with school districts. Code cities and their relationship with public schools, colleges and school districts shall be governed by the provisions of general law, including Titles 28A and 28B RCW. Each code city shall be contained within one school district except as may be otherwise provided in *RCW 28A.315.250.

[ 1983 c 3 s 61; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.28.010.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.315.250 was repealed by 1999 c 315 s 801.